Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB102.
Be It Enacted by the General 29 Assembly of the State of Iowa:â, is equivalent to 30 -18- LSB 1739YC (5) 91 tm/jh 18/ 22 H.C.R. _____ a bill, and must be transmitted to the governor for 1 approval. A joint resolution which proposes amendments 2 to the Constitution of the State of Iowa, ratifies 3 amendments to the Constitution of the United States, 4 proposes a request to Congress or an agency of the 5 government of the United States of America, proposes to 6 Congress an amendment to the Constitution of the United 7 States of America, nullifies an administrative rule, or 8 creates a special commission or committee must contain 9 the clause âBe It Resolved by the General Assembly of 10 the State of Iowa:â and shall not be transmitted to the 11 governor. A joint resolution shall not amend a statute 12 in the Code of Iowa. 13 Rule 22 14 Nullification Resolutions 15 A ânullification resolutionâ is a joint resolution 16 which nullifies all of an administrative rule, or 17 a severable item of an administrative rule adopted 18 pursuant to chapter 17A of the Code. A nullification 19 resolution shall not amend an administrative rule by 20 adding language or by inserting new language in lieu of 21 existing language. 22 A nullification resolution is debatable, but cannot 23 be amended on the floor of the house or senate. The 24 effective date of a nullification resolution shall 25 be stated in the resolution. Any motions filed to 26 reconsider adoption of a nullification resolution 27 must be disposed of within one legislative day of the 28 filing. 29 Rule 23 30 -19- LSB 1739YC (5) 91 tm/jh 19/ 22 H.C.R. _____ Consideration of Vetoes 1 1. The senate and house calendar shall include a 2 list known as the âVeto Calendar.â The veto calendar 3 shall consist of: 4 a. Bills returned to that house chamber by the 5 governor in accordance with Article III, section 16 of 6 the Constitution of the State of Iowa. 7 b. Appropriations items returned to that house 8 chamber by the governor in accordance with Article III, 9 section 16 of the Constitution of the State of Iowa. 10 c. Bills and appropriations items received from the 11 other house chamber after that house chamber has voted 12 to override a veto of them by the governor. 13 2. Vetoed bills and appropriations items shall 14 automatically be placed on the veto calendar upon 15 receipt. Vetoed bills and appropriations items shall 16 not be referred to committee. 17 3. Upon first publication in the veto calendar, the 18 senate majority leader or the house majority leader 19 may call up a vetoed bill or appropriations item at any 20 time. 21 4. The affirmative vote of two-thirds of the 22 members of the body by record roll call is required on 23 a motion to override an executive veto or item veto. 24 5. A motion to override an executive veto or item 25 veto is debatable. A vetoed bill or appropriation item 26 cannot be amended in this case. 27 6. The vote by which a motion to override an 28 executive veto or item veto passes or fails to pass 29 either house chamber is not subject to reconsideration 30 -20- LSB 1739YC (5) 91 tm/jh 20/ 22 H.C.R. _____ under senate rule 24 or house rule 73. 1 7. The secretary of the senate or the chief clerk 2 of the house shall immediately notify the other house 3 chamber of the adoption or rejection of a motion to 4 override an executive veto or item veto. 5 8. All bills and appropriations items on the veto 6 calendar shall be disposed of before adjournment 7 sine die, unless the house chamber having a bill or 8 appropriation item before it declines to do so by 9 unanimous consent. 10 9. Bills and appropriations items on the veto 11 calendar are exempt from deadlines imposed by joint 12 rule 20. 13 Rule 24 14 Special Rules Regarding Redistricting 15 1. If, pursuant to chapter 42, either the senate or 16 the house of representatives rejects a redistricting 17 plan submitted by the legislative services agency, 18 the house chamber rejecting the plan shall convey 19 the reasons for the rejection of the plan to the 20 legislative services agency by resolution. 21 2. If, pursuant to chapter 42, the legislative 22 services agency submits a third redistricting plan 23 as provided by law, the senate and the house of 24 representatives, when considering a bill embodying the 25 third plan, shall be allowed to accept for filing as 26 amendments only such amendments which constitute the 27 total text of a congressional plan without striking 28 a legislative redistricting plan, the total text of 29 a legislative redistricting plan without striking a 30 -21- LSB 1739YC (5) 91 tm/jh 21/ 22 H.C.R. _____ congressional plan, or the combined total text of a 1 congressional plan and a legislative redistricting 2 plan, and nonsubstantive, technical corrections to the 3 text of any such bills or amendments. 4 Rule 25 5 Demonstrations 6 In order to ensure the health and safety of elected 7 officials, employees, the public, and lobbyists, 8 demonstrations are not permitted anywhere on the second 9 floor , third floor, or either chamber of the Capitol. 10 For purposes of this rule, âdemonstrationâ includes the 11 posting, wearing, or carrying of signage, setting up 12 of tables or booths, chanting, rallies, or marches , or 13 engaging in âpublic disorderâ as prohibited in chapter 14 723 including rioting, unlawful assembly, failure to 15 disperse, and disorderly conduct . âDemonstrationâ 16 shall not include the distribution of materials 17 directly to an elected official or employee of the 18 legislature or the wearing of clothing or buttons that 19 contain political statements or messages. 20 -22- LSB 1739YC (5) 91 tm/jh 22/ 22